lexd_components/hyw-ambiguousPOS.lexd
LEXICON NounAdjReg
լերդած:լերդած
ամպարիշտ:ամպարիշտ
բաժանելի:բաժանելի
զարթուցիչ:զարթուցիչ
իմն:իմն
խուզարկ:խուզարկ
խուզարկ:խուզարկ
ռամկօրէն:ռամկօրէն
ծաղկաքաղ:ծաղկաքաղ
ծնող:ծնող
կենդանի:կենդանի
կղերական:կղերական
կոյս:կոյս
հակամաղձային:հակամաղձային
հականեխական:հականեխական
հողմահար:հողմահար
ձիական:ձիական
մագլցող:մագլցող
մանրակտիտ:մանրակտիտ
մանրակրկիտ:մանրակրկիտ
մաքրիչ:մաքրիչ
մեղրակեր:մեղրակեր
միօրեայ:միօրեայ
մնացորդ:մնացորդ
ուղղագիր:ուղղագիր
ուղղիչ:ուղղիչ
ունակ:ունակ
չորրորդ:չորրորդ
պահպանիչ:պահպանիչ
պահպանող:պահպանող
պաշտպանողական:պաշտպանողական
ջեռուցիչ:ջեռուցիչ
սահմանական:սահմանական
սգազգեստ:սգազգեստ
սիր:սիր
սուտ:սուտ
տեսող:տեսող
ցատքող:ցատքող
ագատ:ագատ
ագուցիչ:ագուցիչ
ազատազգի:ազատազգի
ազատասպան:ազատասպան
ազնուական:ազնուական
աթաբէկ:աթաբէկ
աժան:աժան
ալեւոր:ալեւոր
ածանց:ածանց
ակնհար:ակնհար
աղածին:աղածին
աղակերպ:աղակերպ
աղաչող:աղաչող
աղարտիչ:աղարտիչ
աղեղնադրօշ:աղեղնադրօշ
աղէկ:աղէկ
աղմկարար:աղմկարար
աղքատիկ:աղքատիկ
ամբոխավար:ամբոխավար
ամբոխարար:ամբոխարար
ամուսնացած:ամուսնացած
ամուսնացեալ:ամուսնացեալ
ամսական:ամսական
ամրապահակ:ամրապահակ
այժմէական:այժմէական
այլատամ:այլատամ
այսաբնակ:այսաբնակ
այսակիր:այսակիր
այսահար:այսահար
այսօրածին:այսօրածին
անամուսին:անամուսին
անարի:անարի
անարիական:անարիական
անբան:անբան
անդամալոյծ:անդամալոյծ
անդամախեղ:անդամախեղ
անդոյր:անդոյր
անդորր:անդորր
անել:անել
անելանելի:անելանելի
անընդհատ:անընդհատ
անծանօթ:անծանօթ
անկարող:անկարող
անկիզական:անկիզական
անհանգիստ:անհանգիստ
անհաւատ:անհաւատ
անմեղանչական:անմեղանչական
անուանակապ:անուանակապ
աշխարհաբնակ:աշխարհաբնակ
աշխարհակալ:աշխարհակալ
աշխարհական:աշխարհական
ապաժոյժ:ապաժոյժ
ապականիչ:ապականիչ
ապականող:ապականող
ապաշնորհ:ապաշնորհ
ապառաժ:ապառաժ
ապառիկ:ապառիկ
ապերախտ:ապերախտ
ապուշ:ապուշ
առնազէն:առնազէն
առջինեկ:առջինեկ
ասիական:ասիական
աստանդական:աստանդական
աստղահմայ:աստղահմայ
աստղաձեւ:աստղաձեւ
աստուածառաք:աստուածառաք
արամազնեայ:արամազնեայ
արբշիռ:արբշիռ
արեւելցի:արեւելցի
արեւելքցի:արեւելքցի
արիւնագոյն:արիւնագոյն
արիւներանգ:արիւներանգ
արծաթեղէն:արծաթեղէն
արկած:արկած
արուէգ:արուէգ
աւագ:աւագ
աւարառու:աւարառու
աւելորդ:աւելորդ
աւետարանական:աւետարանական
բազմաբարբառ:բազմաբարբառ
բազմաբերան:բազմաբերան
բազմագիր:բազմագիր
բազմապատիկ:բազմապատիկ
բազմոտանի:բազմոտանի
բաժանարար:բաժանարար
բաժանիչ:բաժանիչ
բաժանող:բաժանող
բաժանորդ:բաժանորդ
բաժանորդագին:բաժանորդագին
բաժնող:բաժնող
բանադրեալ:բանադրեալ
բանադրուած:բանադրուած
բանապաշտ:բանապաշտ
բանդագուշող:բանդագուշող
բանող:բանող
բանջարեղէն:բանջարեղէն
բանտակալ:բանտակալ
բանտական:բանտական
բանտամուտ:բանտամուտ
բաշխիչ:բաշխիչ
բաշխող:բաշխող
բարբարոս:բարբարոս
բարեգործ:բարեգործ
բարեշրջական:բարեշրջական
բարոյական:բարոյական
բարուական:բարուական
բիրտ:բիրտ
բծախնդիր:բծախնդիր
բծկան:բծկան
բնակ:բնակ
բնակից:բնակից
բնատիպ:բնատիպ
բոլորածիր:բոլորածիր
բռնակալ:բռնակալ
գաղղիացի:գաղղիացի
գառնենի:գառնենի
գար:գար
գարշաբան:գարշաբան
գինեմոլ:գինեմոլ
գիսաւոր:գիսաւոր
գիտնական:գիտնական
գոյ:գոյ
գովաբանական:գովաբանական
գովասանական:գովասանական
գովիչ:գովիչ
գովող:գովող
գործադիր:գործադիր
գործաթող:գործաթող
գործօն:գործօն
գուժաբեր:գուժաբեր
գրաւող:գրաւող
դաշնադիր:դաշնադիր
դաշնակից:դաշնակից
դաշտանաբեր:դաշտանաբեր
դաշտանահոս:դաշտանահոս
դատարկակեաց:դատարկակեաց
դատափետ:դատափետ
դաւագործ:դաւագործ
դաւաճան:դաւաճան
դեղեխ:դեղեխ
դեր:դեր
դժնեայ:դժնեայ
դիւրագին:դիւրագին
դիւրագնի:դիւրագնի
դմբոյ:դմբոյ
եզակ:եզակ
եզակի:եզակի
եկակոչ:եկակոչ
եկեղեցական:եկեղեցական
եղերերգու:եղերերգու
եղծ:եղծ
ենթաթթու:ենթաթթու
եռաթիւ:եռաթիւ
եռակարգեան:եռակարգեան
եռապատեան:եռապատեան
եռավանկ:եռավանկ
եռափեղկ:եռափեղկ
եռոտանի:եռոտանի
երազատես:երազատես
երգիծաբան:երգիծաբան
երգիծախօս:երգիծախօս
երդմնազանց:երդմնազանց
երդմնախոր:երդմնախոր
երդմնակեր:երդմնակեր
երդմնուրաց:երդմնուրաց
երեքպատիկ:երեքպատիկ
երէզ:երէզ
երիցագոյն:երիցագոյն
երկակշիռ:երկակշիռ
երկայնածնօտ:երկայնածնօտ
երկանուն:երկանուն
երկար:երկար
երկարաձգող:երկարաձգող
երկբերան:երկբերան
երկբերանեան:երկբերանեան
երկլեզուագէտ:երկլեզուագէտ
երկհարիւրամեայ:երկհարիւրամեայ
երկհոլով:երկհոլով
երկոտասաներորդ:երկոտասաներորդ
երկուորեակ:երկուորեակ
երկոքեան:երկոքեան
երկոքին:երկոքին
երկտեսակ:երկտեսակ
երկրակալ:երկրակալ
երրեակ:երրեակ
երրորդութենական:երրորդութենական
եւրոպացի:եւրոպացի
եօթնեակ:եօթնեակ
զազրաբան:զազրաբան
զազրախօս:զազրախօս
զառիվայր:զառիվայր
զառիվեր:զառիվեր
զարկուած:զարկուած
զետեղ:զետեղ
զինուորական:զինուորական
զլացող:զլացող
զննիչ:զննիչ
զոյգ:զոյգ
զուարճարար:զուարճարար
զուգախիտ:զուգախիտ
զուգակից:զուգակից
զտիչ:զտիչ
զտող:զտող
զրահանաւ:զրահանաւ
զրահաւոր:զրահաւոր
զրապաշտ:զրապաշտ
զրապարիշտ:զրապարիշտ
զրեհիկ:զրեհիկ
զրպարտիչ:զրպարտիչ
զրպարտող:զրպարտող
ըմբռնիչ:ըմբռնիչ
ընդակից:ընդակից
ընդարձակիչ:ընդարձակիչ
ընդարձակող:ընդարձակող
ընդդիմադարձ:ընդդիմադարձ
ընդդիմամարտ:ընդդիմամարտ
ընդոծին:ընդոծին
ընծայական:ընծայական
ընտրելի:ընտրելի
թագաւորող:թագաւորող
թացիկ:թացիկ
թաքուստ:թաքուստ
թերահաւատ:թերահաւատ
թերթականջ:թերթականջ
թեւահերձ:թեւահերձ
թղթակազմ:թղթակազմ
թշնամանի:թշնամանի
թշուառական:թշուառական
թոթով:թոթով
թոշակաւոր:թոշակաւոր
թովմայեան:թովմայեան
թուական:թուական
թուակից:թուակից
թռան:թռան
թռչուն:թռչուն
ժամադիր:ժամադիր
ժանեկաձեւ:ժանեկաձեւ
ժխտող:ժխտող
իննանկիւն:իննանկիւն
իննանկիւնի:իննանկիւնի
ինքնագաւառացի:ինքնագաւառացի
ինքնագիր:ինքնագիր
ինքնաշարժ:ինքնաշարժ
ինքնատիպ:ինքնատիպ
իշխեցող:իշխեցող
իշխող:իշխող
լալական:լալական
լալի:լալի
լալկան:լալկան
լայնափողոց:լայնափողոց
լատին:լատին
լացող:լացող
լեառնական:լեառնական
լեգէոնական:լեգէոնական
լենինական:լենինական
լեռնակեաց:լեռնակեաց
լեռնակեցիկ:լեռնակեցիկ
լծորդ:լծորդ
լնդագար:լնդագար
լուծեալ:լուծեալ
լուծողական:լուծողական
լուծուած:լուծուած
լուսաբանող:լուսաբանող
լուսաբնակ:լուսաբնակ
լուսակերպ:լուսակերպ
լուսակիր:լուսակիր
լուսաւորեալ:լուսաւորեալ
լուսաւորիչ:լուսաւորիչ
լուսնաժէտ:լուսնաժէտ
լուսնահար:լուսնահար
լուսնամէջ:լուսնամէջ
լսնամորթ:լսնամորթ
լսող:լսող
խաբեբայ:խաբեբայ
խածանող:խածանող
խաղամոլ:խաղամոլ
խաշմ:խաշմ
խաչագող:խաչագող
խաչակիր:խաչակիր
խառնագնաց:խառնագնաց
խառնածին:խառնածին
խառնածնունդ:խառնածնունդ
խարկեայք:խարկեայք
խաւար:խաւար
խաւարտք:խաւարտք
խենդ:խենդ
խենթ:խենթ
խեռ:խեռ
խեցապատեան:խեցապատեան
խեցեմորթ:խեցեմորթ
խմող:խմող
խնդրակ:խնդրակ
խնդրող:խնդրող
խոզախտաւոր:խոզախտաւոր
խոժոռ:խոժոռ
խոկ:խոկ
խոտակեր:խոտակեր
խորայոյզ:խորայոյզ
խորանազարդ:խորանազարդ
խորանակապ:խորանակապ
խորհող:խորհող
խորհրդատու:խորհրդատու
խորհրդարանական:խորհրդարանական
խուլ:խուլ
խպիպաւոր:խպիպաւոր
խռովիչ:խռովիչ
խրախճանակից:խրախճանակից
խցարգել:խցարգել
խօլ:խօլ
խօսող:խօսող
ծախիչ:ծախիչ
ծաղկաբեր:ծաղկաբեր
ծաղրածու:ծաղրածու
ծաղրակատակ:ծաղրակատակ
ծայրանուն:ծայրանուն
ծանծաղամիտ:ծանծաղամիտ
ծանօթ:ծանօթ
ծառուտ:ծառուտ
ծասքողական:ծասքողական
ծիծաղող:ծիծաղող
ծխող:ծխող
ծնկակապ:ծնկակապ
ծովագնաց:ծովագնաց
կագազարթոյց:կագազարթոյց
կազմակերպիչ:կազմակերպիչ
կազմիչ:կազմիչ
կազմող:կազմող
կաթուածահար:կաթուածահար
կալանաւոր:կալանաւոր
կալաքարաձեւ:կալաքարաձեւ
կալուինական:կալուինական
կախարդիչ:կախարդիչ
կակազ:կակազ
կակղաթեւ:կակղաթեւ
կաղ:կաղ
կամարակապ:կամարակապ
կամարաւոր:կամարաւոր
կամաւոր:կամաւոր
կայլակահոս:կայլակահոս
կայծքարուտ:կայծքարուտ
կանանչ:կանանչ
կանաչ:կանաչ
կանխագէտ:կանխագէտ
կանխերգ:կանխերգ
կանոնաւորիչ:կանոնաւորիչ
կանոնաւորող:կանոնաւորող
կատակերգ:կատակերգ
կատակերգակ:կատակերգակ
կարգաւոր:կարգաւոր
կարգաւորեալ:կարգաւորեալ
կարօտ:կարօտ
կեղեքիչ:կեղեքիչ
կեղծաւոր:կեղծաւոր
կեղծող:կեղծող
կենդանակերպ:կենդանակերպ
կերող:կերող
կէս:կէս
կիլիկեան:կիլիկեան
կիլիկեցի:կիլիկեցի
կիսաբոլոր:կիսաբոլոր
կիսամասն:կիսամասն
կծծի:կծծի
կծոխոր:կծոխոր
կղզեցի:կղզեցի
կշտամբիչ:կշտամբիչ
կոխիչ:կոխիչ
կոկոզաբան:կոկոզաբան
կողմնակից:կողմնակից
կոճկէն:կոճկէն
կոչնական:կոչնական
կոտորիչ:կոտորիչ
կոտորող:կոտորող
կոտրող:կոտրող
կոտրտուող:կոտրտուող
կործանիչ:կործանիչ
կորճատամ:կորճատամ
կուռ:կուռ
կուսան:կուսան
կռուակից:կռուակից
կտրած:կտրած
կրաշաղախ:կրաշաղախ
կրկտաքաղ:կրկտաքաղ
կրող:կրող
կրօնաւոր:կրօնաւոր
կցորդ:կցորդ
հալածիչ:հալածիչ
հակագրգիռ:հակագրգիռ
հակագրգռիչ:հակագրգռիչ
հակադարձ:հակադարձ
հակադրող:հակադրող
հակաժահրային:հակաժահրային
հակախոյլ:հակախոյլ
հակակատաղական:հակակատաղական
հակահարբխային:հակահարբխային
հակահիւծախտական:հակահիւծախտական
հակամղձաւանջ:հակամղձաւանջ
հակայեղափոխական:հակայեղափոխական
հակաշփական:հակաշփական
հակաջղագար:հակաջղագար
հակառակող:հակառակող
հակառակորդ:հակառակորդ
հակարիւնահոսական:հակարիւնահոսական
հակափսխեցուցիչ:հակափսխեցուցիչ
հակաքնէածական:հակաքնէածական
հաղորդ:հաղորդ
հաղորդական:հաղորդական
համագումար:համագումար
համագունդ:համագունդ
համադիր:համադիր
համայնալուծիչ:համայնալուծիչ
համայնախորտակ:համայնախորտակ
համայնացոյց:համայնացոյց
համառօտագիծ:համառօտագիծ
համառօտող:համառօտող
համասիւն:համասիւն
համարատու:համարատու
համբակ:համբակ
համգունդ:համգունդ
հայերէն:հայերէն
հայհոյիչ:հայհոյիչ
հայրանուն:հայրանուն
հանգուցեալ:հանգուցեալ
հանգստական:հանգստական
հանդիպակաց:հանդիպակաց
հանդիսական:հանդիսական
հանրաստուածեան:հանրաստուածեան
հաշմ:հաշմ
հաշմանդամ:հաշմանդամ
հաշտարար:հաշտարար
հաշտեցուցիչ:հաշտեցուցիչ
հաջող:հաջող
հաստատական:հաստատական
հաստատիչ:հաստատիչ
հաստատող:հաստատող
հատողական:հատողական
հատուցանող:հատուցանող
հարիւրապատիկ:հարիւրապատիկ
հարկաբեր:հարկաբեր
հարկատու:հարկատու
հարուստ:հարուստ
հարստահար:հարստահար
հարստահարիչ:հարստահարիչ
հարցնող:հարցնող
հարցող:հարցող
հաւատացեալ:հաւատացեալ
հեթանոս:հեթանոս
հեշտ:հեշտ
հեշտաբան:հեշտաբան
հեռատես:հեռատես
հետազօտող:հետազօտող
հետեւակ:հետեւակ
հետեւարկ:հետեւարկ
հետեւորդ:հետեւորդ
հերաթափ:հերաթափ
հերձուածող:հերձուածող
հէգ:հէգ
հէք:հէք
հինաւուրց:հինաւուրց
հինգօրեայ:հինգօրեայ
հիւսիսական:հիւսիսական
հիւսուած:հիւսուած
հմակեր:հմակեր
հնարող:հնարող
հնգասիւն:հնգասիւն
հնդիկ:հնդիկ
հոգեւորական:հոգեւորական
հողակեր:հողակեր
հողմաբեր:հողմաբեր
հոմախոհ:հոմախոհ
հոմահամար:հոմահամար
հռովմէական:հռովմէական
հսկայ:հսկայ
հսկայաքայլ:հսկայաքայլ
հրաբաժակ:հրաբաժակ
հրաբերան:հրաբերան
հրաբուխ:հրաբուխ
հրահատ:հրահատ
հրաշագործ:հրաշագործ
հրաշափառ:հրաշափառ
հրապուրիչ:հրապուրիչ
հրապուրող:հրապուրող
հրաջերմ:հրաջերմ
հրդեհիչ:հրդեհիչ
հրկիզեալ:հրկիզեալ
ձագակեր:ձագակեր
ձախլիկ:ձախլիկ
ձայնատու:ձայնատու
ձեռնադրելի:ձեռնադրելի
ձեռնադրիչ:ձեռնադրիչ
ձեռնադրող:ձեռնադրող
ձեռնասուն:ձեռնասուն
ձեռնատու:ձեռնատու
ձեռնբեկ:ձեռնբեկ
ձեռնտու:ձեռնտու
ձիախաղաց:ձիախաղաց
ձողաբարձ:ձողաբարձ
ձողակերտ:ձողակերտ
ձոյլ:ձոյլ
ձուածին:ձուածին
ձուլածոյ:ձուլածոյ
ղեւտական:ղեւտական
ճակատագրական:ճակատագրական
ճանչցող:ճանչցող
ճառագայթաբեր:ճառագայթաբեր
ճարտարական:ճարտարական
ճարտարարուեստական:ճարտարարուեստական
ճգնող:ճգնող
ճեմական:ճեմական
ճենարէն:ճենարէն
ճեպընթաց:ճեպընթաց
ճոռոմաբան:ճոռոմաբան
ճռճռացող:ճռճռացող
ճռուող:ճռուող
մագլող:մագլող
մալայերէն:մալայերէն
մածնակերպ:մածնակերպ
մակածիչ:մակածիչ
մակարդակ:մակարդակ
մահագուշակ:մահագուշակ
մահազեկոյց:մահազեկոյց
մահապարտ:մահապարտ
մահուչափ:մահուչափ
մաղասկաթ:մաղասկաթ
մաղձայոյզ:մաղձայոյզ
մանահանիկ:մանահանիկ
մանուած:մանուած
մանրազնին:մանրազնին
մանրամասն:մանրամասն
մանրամատն:մանրամատն
մանրապտուղ:մանրապտուղ
մանրատերեւ:մանրատերեւ
մաշկաթեւք:մաշկաթեւք
մառայլ:մառայլ
մատնագնաց:մատնագնաց
մարախակերպ:մարախակերպ
մարդահաճ:մարդահաճ
մարդահաճոյ:մարդահաճոյ
մարդատեաց:մարդատեաց
մարթ:մարթ
մարոնացի:մարոնացի
մարսողածին:մարսողածին
մաքիաւելեան:մաքիաւելեան
մաքրակրօն:մաքրակրօն
մաքրող:մաքրող
մեխմեխ:մեխմեխ
մեծաբան:մեծաբան
մեծահաց:մեծահաց
մեծամոլ:մեծամոլ
մեծաչեայ:մեծաչեայ
մեծապատիկ:մեծապատիկ
մեծատամ:մեծատամ
մեծացուցիչ:մեծացուցիչ
մեծուղեղ:մեծուղեղ
մեկնիչ:մեկնիչ
մեկնող:մեկնող
մեղադիր:մեղադիր
մեղծ:մեղծ
մեղմեխ:մեղմեխ
մեղմեղ:մեղմեղ
մեղսակից:մեղսակից
մեղսաքաւիչ:մեղսաքաւիչ
մենակաց:մենակաց
մենակեաց:մենակեաց
մենամոլ:մենամոլ
մեռելոտի:մեռելոտի
մերժիչ:մերժիչ
մերժող:մերժող
մերկացուցիչ:մերկացուցիչ
մէզմուղ:մէզմուղ
միաբլթակ:միաբլթակ
միադաւան:միադաւան
միականի:միականի
միահամար:միահամար
միանձն:միանձն
միանձնական:միանձնական
միանուն:միանուն
միապատեան:միապատեան
միապետական:միապետական
միասայրի:միասայրի
միասմբակ:միասմբակ
միասնունդ:միասնունդ
միաստուածեան:միաստուածեան
միատամ:միատամ
միատող:միատող
միլիոնատէր:միլիոնատէր
միողնի:միողնի
միոտանի:միոտանի
միջատակերպ:միջատակերպ
միսիօնարական:միսիօնարական
մխիթար:մխիթար
մխիթարիչ:մխիթարիչ
մկնեայք:մկնեայք
մոլեխանձ:մոլեխանձ
մոլեռանդ:մոլեռանդ
մոլորական:մոլորական
մոլորեցնող:մոլորեցնող
մոլորեցուցիչ:մոլորեցուցիչ
մոմեղէն:մոմեղէն
մորթեզերծ:մորթեզերծ
մութ:մութ
մուրացիկ:մուրացիկ
մուրացկան:մուրացկան
մուրացող:մուրացող
մռայլ:մռայլ
մսաբեր:մսաբեր
մտածող:մտածող
մտամոլար:մտամոլար
մրգաթափ:մրգաթափ
մրճահար:մրճահար
մրմռացող:մրմռացող
մրցանակառու:մրցանակառու
մօտասեր:մօտասեր
յաժան:յաժան
յաղթական:յաղթական
յաղթանակող:յաղթանակող
յաղթկու:յաղթկու
յաղթող:յաղթող
յաղթու:յաղթու
յաճախաբաց:յաճախաբաց
յաճախական:յաճախական
յաճախամիզիչ:յաճախամիզիչ
յամառօտ:յամառօտ
յայտարարող:յայտարարող
յանդիմանիչ:յանդիմանիչ
յանդիմանող:յանդիմանող
յապաղիչ:յապաղիչ
յաջորդ:յաջորդ
յառաջադիր:յառաջադիր
յառաջդիմական:յառաջդիմական
յառաջընթաց:յառաջընթաց
յառաջմղիչ:յառաջմղիչ
